__1st_try_roman_lexica__/conj.lexc
!!!conj.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Conj

LEXICON Root
Conj;

LEXICON ConjInf
+Conj:0 #;

LEXICON Conj
!Lexical items from corpus
agrne	ConjInf;
mntea	ConjInf;
blke	ConjInf;
mntey	ConjInf;
age	ConjInf;
w	ConjInf;
by_ānke	ConjInf;
,	ConjInf;
ke	ConjInf;
wlykn	ConjInf;
aynke	ConjInf;
emčnyn	ConjInf;
-	ConjInf;
agr	ConjInf;
ama	ConjInf;
aly	ConjInf;
ya	ConjInf;
xwae	ConjInf;
lkn	ConjInf;
lykn	ConjInf;
ta	ConjInf;
wly	ConjInf;
